Utah statutes.
16-6a-1703.   Nonapplicability of chapter.

This chapter does not apply to:

(1)  corporations sole, except with respect to mergers and consolidations; or

(2)  domestic or foreign nonprofit corporations governed by Title 3, Chapter 1, General Provisions Relating to Agricultural Cooperative Associations.

